Louisiana, session 2026, HB201.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:273.5 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§273.5. State Seal of Fine Arts
A. The State Seal of Fine Arts, referred to in this Section as the "seal",
certifies that a student meets all of the following criteria:
(1) Completion of four credits in the same arts discipline, such as music,
dance, visual arts, theater, media arts, or culinary arts.
(2) A minimum grade point average of 3.00 for the arts credits completed.
(3) Completion of an arts-related capstone performance or portfolio.
B. The state superintendent of education shall do the following:
(1) Prepare and deliver to participating school governing authorities an
appropriate insignia to be affixed to the diploma or transcript of a student who has
earned the seal.
(2) Provide other information he deems necessary for school governing
authorities to successfully participate in the seal program.
C. A participating public school governing authority shall maintain
appropriate records in order to identify students who have earned the seal and affix
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 201 ENROLLED
the appropriate insignia to the diploma or transcript of each student who earns the
seal.
D. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
promulgate rules in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement
the provisions of this Section, including but not limited to requirements for a
capstone performance or portfolio as provided for in Paragraph (A)(3) of this
Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.